Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1272.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; state treasurer; city of Douglas; Douglas port of entry A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer for distribution to the city of Douglas for the state match of the Douglas port of entry. B. The monies appropriated in subsection A of this section may be expended only to the extent that the general services administration provides an award of $678,000,000 for the Douglas port of entry.